pl: Typ projektu wykroju krawieckiego do dekoracji domu: Fartuch; Panel zasłonowy; Poduszka; Kosz/pojemnik z materiału; Serwetka; Legowisko dla zwierząt; Poszewka na poduszkę; Podkładka na stół; Łapka kuchenna; Kołdra; Roleta rzymska; Pokrowiec; Organizer do przechowywania; Bieżnik; Obrus; Ściereczka kuchenna; Narzuta; Lambrekin; Ozdoba ścienna; Inny
fr: Type de projet de patron de couture pour la décoration intérieure: Tablier; Panneau de rideau; Coussin; Panier/bac en tissu; Serviette de table; Panier pour animaux; Housse de coussin; Set de table; Manique; Courtepointe; Store romain; Housse; Organiseur de rangement; Chemin de table; Nappe; Torchon; Jeté; Cantonnière; Tenture murale; Autre
it: Tipo di progetto di cartamodello per arredo della casa: Grembiule; Pannello per tenda; Cuscino; Cestino/Contenitore in tessuto; Tovagliolo; Cuccia per animali; Fodera per cuscino; Tovaglietta; Presina; Trapunta; Tenda a pacchetto; Fodera copridivano; Organizer portaoggetti; Runner da tavola; Tovaglia; Strofinaccio; Plaid da divano; Mantovana; Decorazione da parete; Altro
bg-BG: Тип проект за шивашки модел за домашен декор: Престилка; Завеса; Възглавница; Текстилен кош/кошница; Салфетка; Легло за домашни любимци; Калъфка за възглавница; Подложка за хранене; Ръкохватка за горещи съдове; Юрган; Римска щора; Калъф за мебели; Органайзер за съхранение; Тишлайфер; Покривка; Кърпа за съдове; Одеяло; Драперия; Стенно пано; Друго
nb: Startside dekor symønster prosjekttype: Forkle; Gardinpanel; Pute; Kurv/boks i stoff; Serviett; Kjæledyrseng; Putetrekk; Dekkebrikke; Gryteklut; Lappeteppe; Liftgardin; Møbeltrekk; Oppbevaringsløsning; Bordløper; Duk; Kjøkkenhåndkle; Pledd; Gardinkappe; Veggoppheng; Annet
tr: Ev dekorasyonu dikiş kalıbı modeli türü: Önlük; Perde kanadı; Minder; Kumaş sepet/kutu; Peçete; Evcil hayvan yatağı; Yastık kılıfı; Amerikan servis; Tutaç; Yorgan; Katlamalı perde; Kılıf; Saklama düzenleyici; Runner; Masa örtüsü; Kurulama bezi; Koltuk şalı; Fırfır; Duvar süsü; Diğer
hr-HR: Vrsta projekta kroja za šivanje početnih ukrasa: Pregača; Zastor; Jastuk; Platnena košara/kanta; Ubrus; Krevet za kućne ljubimce; Jastučnica; Podmetač; Hvataljka za lonce; Prošiveni prekrivač; Rolo zavjesa; Navlaka; Organizator za pohranu; Nadstolnjak; Stolnjak; Kuhinjska krpa; Dekica; Kratka zavjesa; Zidni ukras; Ostalo
es: Tipo de proyecto de patrón de costura para decoración del hogar: Delantal; Panel de cortina; Cojín; Cesta/contenedor de tela; Servilleta; Cama para mascotas; Funda de almohada; Mantel individual; Agarradera de cocina; Colcha; Estor romano; Funda protectora; Organizador de almacenamiento; Camino de mesa; Mantel; Paño de cocina; Manta; Cenefa; Tapiz de pared; Otro
da: Type af symønster til boligindretning: Forklæde; Gardinfag; Pude; Stofkurv/-beholder; Serviet; Kæledyrsseng; Pudebetræk; Dækkeserviet; Grydelap; Quilt; Foldegardin; Møbelbetræk; Opbevaringssystem; Bordløber; Dug; Viskestykke; Plaid; Gardinkappe; Vægophæng; Andet
ko: 홈 데코 재봉 패턴 프로젝트 유형: 앞치마; 커튼 패널; 쿠션; 패브릭 바구니/빈; 냅킨; 반려동물 침대; 베개 커버; 플레이스매트; 냄비 홀더; 퀼트; 로만 셰이드; 슬립커버; 수납 오거나이저; 테이블 러너; 테이블보; 티 타월; 스로우 담요; 밸런스; 벽걸이 장식; 기타
pt-BR: Tipo de projeto de molde/padrão de costura de decoração para casa: Avental; Painel de cortina; Almofada; Cesta/caixa de tecido; Guardanapo; Cama para animais de estimação; Capa de travesseiro; Jogo americano; Pegador de panela; Colcha; Cortina romana; Capa protetora; Organizador de armazenamento; Caminho de mesa; Toalha de mesa; Pano de prato; Manta; Sanefa; Decoração de parede; Outros
zh-TW: 家居裝飾縫紉紙樣專案類型: 圍裙; 窗簾; 靠墊; 布籃/收納盒; 餐巾; 寵物床; 抱枕套; 餐墊; 隔熱墊; 拼布被/絎縫被; 羅馬簾; 沙發套; 收納袋; 桌旗; 桌布; 茶巾; 蓋毯; 窗側帷幔/短窗簾; 壁飾; 其他
vi: Loại dự án mẫu may trang trí nhà cửa: Tạp dề; Rèm cửa; Đệm; Giỏ/thùng vải; Khăn ăn; Giường cho thú cưng; Vỏ gối; Khăn trải lót đĩa; Đồ lót nồi; Chăn chần bông; Rèm Roman; Vỏ bọc ghế; Dụng cụ sắp xếp lưu trữ; Khăn trải giữa bàn; Khăn trải bàn; Khăn lau chén; Chăn phủ; Rèm diềm; Đồ treo tường; Khác
cs: Typ projektu šicího vzoru pro domácí dekorace: Zástěra; Záclonový panel; Podsedák; Látkový košík/box; Ubrousek; Pelíšek pro mazlíčky; Povlak na polštář; Prostírání; Chňapka; Quilt; Římská roleta; Potah; Úložný organizér; Běhoun na stůl; Ubrus; Utěrka; Přehoz; Volán; Nástěnný závěs; Jiný
sl-SI: Vrsta projekta šivalnega kroja za dom: Predpasnik; Panelna zavesa; Blazina; Košara/posoda iz blaga; Prtiček; Postelja za hišne ljubljenčke; Prevleka za blazino; Pogrinjek; Prijemalka za posodo; Prešita odeja; Gubani rolo; Sedežna prevleka; Organizator za shranjevanje; Tekač za mizo; Prt; Kuhinjska krpa; Okrasna odeja; Kratka zavesa; Stenska obesa; Drugo
de: Projektart des Home-Deko-Schnittmusters: Schürze; Vorhangschal; Kissen; Stoffkorb/-behälter; Serviette; Haustierbett; Kissenbezug; Tischset; Topflappen; Quilt; Raffrollo; Schonbezug; Aufbewahrungs-Organizer; Tischläufer; Tischdecke; Geschirrtuch; Kuscheldecke; Querbehang; Wandbehang; Andere
sv: Projekttyp för heminredningssymönster: Förkläde; Gardinlängd; Dyna; Tygkorg/-låda; Servett; Husdjursbädd; Kuddfodral; Bordstablett; Grytlapp; Lapptäcke; Hissgardin; Överdrag; Förvaringsorganisatör; Bordslöpare; Bordsduk; Kökshandduk; Pläd; Gardinkappa; Väggbonad; Annat
pt-PT: Tipo de projeto de padrão de costura de decoração inicial: Avental; Painel de cortina; Almofada; Cesto/recipiente em tecido; Guardanapo; Cama para animal de estimação; Fronha; Individual; Pega de panela; Colcha; Estor romano; Capa; Organizador de arrumação; Caminho de mesa; Toalha de mesa; Pano de prato; Manta; Bandelete; Tapeçaria de parede; Outro
fi: Kodin sisustuksen ompelukaavaprojektin tyyppi: Esiliina; Verhopaneeli; Istuintyyny; Kangaskori/-laatikko; Lautasliina; Lemmikin peti; Tyynynpäällinen; Tabletti; Patakinnas/-lappu; Tilkkutäkki; Laskosverho; Irtopäällinen; Säilytyslokerikko; Kaitaliina; Pöytäliina; Keittiöpyyhe; Torkkupeitto; Kappaverho; Seinävaate; Muu
ro-RO: Tip de proiect de model de cusut pentru decorațiuni interioare: Șorț; Panou de perdea; Pernă; Coș din material textil; Șervețel; Pat pentru animale de companie; Față de pernă; Suport pentru farfurie; Suport pentru oale; Pilotă; Jaluzea romană; Husă de protecție; Organizator pentru depozitare; Traversă de masă; Față de masă; Prosop de bucătărie; Pătură decorativă; Draperie scurtă; Decorațiune de perete; Altele
sk-SK: Typ projektu strihu na šitie bytových doplnkov: Zástera; Závesový panel; Vankúš; Látkový kôš/nádoba; Obrúsok; Pelech pre zvieratá; Obliečka na vankúš; Prestieranie; Chňapka; Prešívaná deka; Rímska roleta; Poťah; Úložný organizér; Behúň na stôl; Obrus; Utierka; Prikrývka; Drapéria; Nástenná dekorácia; Iné
zh-CN: 家居装饰缝纫图案项目类型: 围裙; 窗帘; 靠垫; 布艺收纳篮/收纳筐; 餐巾; 宠物床; 枕套; 餐垫; 隔热垫; 被子; 罗马帘; 椅套/沙发套; 收纳用品; 桌旗; 桌布; 茶巾; 盖毯; 窗幔; 壁挂饰品; 其他
hu: Lakberendezési szabásminta projekt típusa: Kötény; Függönypanel; Párna; Szövetkosár/tároló; Szalvéta; Kisállatágy; Párnahuzat; Tányéralátét; Edényfogó; Paplan; Római roló; Bútorhuzat; Tárolórendszerező; Asztali futó; Asztalterítő; Konyharuha; Dísztakaró; Karnistakaró; Fali kárpit; Egyéb
lt-LT: Namų dekoro siuvimo iškarpos projekto tipas: Prijuostė; Užuolaidų panelė; Pagalvėlė; Medžiaginis krepšys / dėžė; Servetėlė; Gyvūno gultas; Pagalvės užvalkalas; Padėkliukas; Puodkėlė; Skiautinys; Romanetė; Baldo užvalkalas; Daiktų organizuoklis; Stalo takelis; Staltiesė; Virtuvinis rankšluostis; Pledas; Lambrekenas; Sienos dekoracija; Kita
ru: Тип проекта выкройки для домашнего декора: Фартук; Портьера; Подушка на сиденье; Тканевая корзина/контейнер; Салфетка; Лежанка для питомца; Наволочка; Плейсмат; Прихватка; Стеганое одеяло; Римская штора; Чехол на мебель; Органайзер для хранения; Дорожка на стол; Скатерть; Кухонное полотенце; Плед; Ламбрекен; Настенное панно; Другое
nl: Woondecoratie naaipatroon projecttype: Schort; Gordijnpaneel; Kussen; Stoffen mand/bak; Servet; Dierenmand; Kussensloop; Placemat; Pannenlap; Quilt; Vouwgordijn; Stoelhoes; Opberg-organizer; Tafelloper; Tafelkleed; Theedoek; Plaid; Valletje; Wandkleed; Overig
ja: ホームデコレーションのソーイングパターンプロジェクトタイプ: エプロン; カーテンパネル; クッション; ファブリックバスケット/ビン; ナプキン; ペット用ベッド; ピローカバー; プレイスマット; 鍋つかみ; キルト; ローマンシェード; スリップカバー; 収納オーガナイザー; テーブルランナー; テーブルクロス; ティータオル; スローブランケット; 飾りバランス; 壁掛け; その他
el: Τύπος έργου για πατρόν ραπτικής διακόσμησης σπιτιού: Ποδιά; Φύλλο κουρτίνας; Μαξιλάρι; Υφασμάτινο καλάθι/κάδος; Πετσέτα φαγητού; Κρεβάτι κατοικιδίου; Κάλυμμα μαξιλαριού; Σουπλά; Πιάστρα κατσαρόλας; Πάπλωμα; Στόρι ρόμαν; Ριχτάρι; Οργανωτής αποθήκευσης; Ράνερ τραπεζιού; Τραπεζομάντιλο; Πετσέτα κουζίνας; Κουβέρτα καναπέ; Γείσο κουρτίνας; Διακοσμητικό τοίχου; Άλλο
en: Home decor sewing pattern project type: Apron; Curtain panel; Cushion; Fabric basket/bin; Napkin; Pet bed; Pillow cover; Placemat; Pot holder; Quilt; Roman shade; Slipcover; Storage organizer; Table runner; Tablecloth; Tea towel; Throw blanket; Valance; Wall hanging; Other
th: แบบแพทเทิร์นเย็บปักถักร้อยสำหรับตกแต่งบ้าน: ผ้ากันเปื้อน; ผ้าม่านแบบบาน; เบาะรองนั่ง; ตะกร้า/ถังผ้า; ผ้าเช็ดปาก; ที่นอนสัตว์เลี้ยง; ปลอกหมอน; แผ่นรองจาน; ที่จับของร้อน; ผ้าห่มควิลท์; ม่านพับ; ผ้าคลุมเฟอร์นิเจอร์; ที่จัดเก็บของ; ผ้าคาดโต๊ะ; ผ้าปูโต๊ะ; ผ้าเช็ดจาน; ผ้าห่มอเนกประสงค์; ระบายม่าน; ผ้าแขวนผนัง; อื่นๆ